Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-7,102
Livestock certification program; information; disclosure; when.

Information collected or published by the department pursuant to sections 54-797 to 54-7,103 shall not disclose the identity of individual livestock producers, except for:

(1) Information published in a livestock certification registry; and

(2) Information collected for the purpose of a voluntary livestock certification program that may be disclosed by the State Veterinarian when, in his or her judgment, failure to disclose the name of a livestock producer or producers could result in the spread of a dangerous, contagious, infectious, or otherwise transmissible disease to and among livestock.

Laws 2001, LB 438, § 15.

Definitions, see section 54-701.03.